Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6587YH (3) 91 da/js H.F. 2727 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 200.5A Report ââ pricing 1 information. 2 1. If a manufacturer is required to be licensed under 3 section 200.4 and sells a brand of fertilizer required to be 4 registered pursuant section 200.5 on a wholesale or retail 5 basis to a customer in this state, the manufacturer shall 6 report to the department each month pricing information, as 7 required by the department. The pricing information must at 8 least include all of the following: 9 a. (1) The current price per ton paid by the manufacturer 10 for each active ingredient used to manufacture each named 11 registered brand of fertilizer sold in this state. 12 (2) For purposes of subparagraph (1), an active ingredient 13 includes the minimum percentage of plant nutrients as stated on 14 the brandâs label in the form of a guaranteed analysis. 15 b. The total quantity of each named registered brand of 16 fertilizer sold by the manufacturer to all customers in this 17 state and the total quantity of all named registered brands 18 of fertilizers sold by the licensee to all customers in this 19 state. 20 c. The lowest and highest price for each named registered 21 brand sold by the manufacturer to customers in this state. 22 d. The terms of any agreement entered into by the licensee 23 and a customer for the discounted sale price of each named 24 registered brand of fertilizer sold in this state. 25 2. a. A manufacturer who violates subsection 1 is subject 26 to a civil penalty that may be administratively imposed, 27 assessed, and collected by the department acting in cooperation 28 with the attorney general. 29 b. The department shall establish by rule a schedule 30 of civil penalties to be imposed upon a manufacturer that 31 is determined to have violated subsection 1. The schedule 32 shall provide procedures and criteria for the administrative 33 assessment of penalties. In adopting the schedule, the 34 department shall consider among other factors determined 35 -1- LSB 6587YH (3) 91 da/js 1/ 3 H.F. 2727 relevant by the department all of the following: 1 (1) The total volume of registered brands of fertilizers 2 that the manufacturer sells in this state. 3 (2) The costs saved or likely to be saved by the 4 manufacturer in not complying with subsection 1. 5 (3) The gravity of the manufacturerâs violation of 6 subsection 1. 7 (4) The degree of the manufacturerâs willfulness in 8 violating subsection 1. 9 c. The department shall impose a civil penalty under this 10 subsection of not more than fifty thousand dollars for each 11 violation of subsection 1. Each day that a violation continues 12 shall be considered a separate offense. 13 Sec. 2. ADMINISTRATIVE RULES. The department may adopt 14 emergency rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, and section 15 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, to administer this Act and 16 the rules shall be effective immediately upon filing unless 17 a later date is specified in the rules. Any rules adopted 18 in accordance with this section shall also be published as a 19 notice of intended action as provided in section 17A.4. 20 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 21 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 22